Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.100

Stay of execution of forfeiture judgment—Bond.

The parties, or either of them, against whom such judgment may be entered in the superior or supreme courts, may stay said execution for sixty days by giving a bond with two or more sureties, to be approved by the clerk, conditioned for the payment of such judgment at the expiration of sixty days, unless the same shall be vacated before the expiration of that time.

[ 1891 c 28 s 86; Code 1881 s 1138; 1873 p 242 s 281; 1867 p 103 s 2; RRS s 2232. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1891 c 28 s 87; Code 1881 s 1139; 1867 p 103 s 3; RRS s 2233, now codified as RCW 10.19.105.]